Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.075

Grain dealer licenses—Issuance—Posting—Duration.

The department shall issue a grain dealer license to an applicant upon its determination that the application is in its proper form and upon approval of the matters contained on the application and upon a showing that the applicant has complied with the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted hereunder. The licensee shall immediately upon receipt of the license post it in a conspicuous place in its principal place of business. The license expires automatically on a date set by rule by the director unless it has been revoked, canceled, or suspended by the department before that date. Fees shall be prorated where necessary in order to accommodate staggered renewal of a license or licenses.

[ 1991 c 109 s 28; 1983 c 305 s 26.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.